Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-562
Class V school district; board of education; meetings; quorum; attendance, how compelled; absence; effect.

A majority of all the members of a board of education of a Class V school district shall constitute a quorum, but a less number in attendance at any regular meeting shall have and a quorum at any special meeting may have power to compel the attendance of absent members in such manner and under such penalties as each board prescribes. The absence of any member from four consecutive regular meetings of the board, unless on account of sickness or by consent of the board, shall vacate his or her position on the board. Such facts shall be passed upon by the board of education and spread upon its records.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 14, p. 322;

R.S.1913, § 7013;

C.S.1922, § 6644;

C.S.1929, § 79-2707;

R.S.1943, § 79-2707;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 253, p. 776;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1003.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 315.